Washington statutes.
RCW 36.68.490

Annual excess levy or bond retirement levies—Election procedure—Vote required.

In order for the annual excess tax levy proposition or bond retirement levies proposition to be approved, voters exceeding in number at least sixty percent of the number of voters who cast ballots for the office of county legislative authority within the park and recreation area, or within the proposed service area, in the last preceding general election for that office must cast ballots on the tax levy proposition, and of all the votes cast at the election at least sixty percent of said votes must approve the annual excess tax levy or the bond retirement levies.

[ 1981 c 210 s 8; 1963 c 218 s 10.]

NOTES:

Severability—1981 c 210: See note following RCW 36.68.400.